Hawaii statutes.
[§712-1277.5] Contempt. Any person who
knowingly violates any order issued pursuant to this part shall be subject to
civil contempt as well as punishment for criminal contempt of court under
section 710-1077. Nothing in this section shall be construed in any way to
preclude or preempt a criminal prosecution for violation of a controlled
substance offense or any other criminal offense. [L 2005, c 123, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next